Facilities Construction The School District of Hillsborough County (SDHC) has an efficient school planning and construction operation.
Serious problems with overcrowding are effectively addressed, schools are generally delivered on time and within budget, and sites are acquired in a timely fashion.
Conclusion
_____________________________________________________
SDHC effectively addresses the twin problems of serious overcrowding and deteriorated facilities.
Projects are well managed and largely within budget and on schedule.
Sites are acquired in a timely fashion at reasonable prices and construction quality is generally good based upon inspections of recently built schools.
During the course of this review, Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. has identified a number of district accomplishments in the area of facilities construction, some of which are included in Exhibit 10-1 below.
Exhibit 10-1
The District Has Had a Number of Notable Accomplishments in Facilities Construction in the Last Three Years · Five years ago, 57 schools in SDHC were critically overcrowded (utilization above 120 percent).
Today that number has been cut to 19 schools, and by the end of the current five-year plan, the district anticipates it will be reduced to zero.
This was accomplished even as the population of the district has increased by 18,000 students over the last five years and continues to grow at the rate of about 3,500 students a year.
The Division of Planning and Construction manages an $800 million, five-year school planning and construction program with a staff of only 24 managers, professionals and administrative support personnel.
This compares very favorably to staffing levels at other large school districts across the nation.
By diligently applying frugal construction standards and management practices, the district has qualified for over $20 million in School Infrastructure Thrift (SIT) awards from the state over the past five years.
In fact, 90 percent of all new construction projects within the district were accomplished at or below state average prices.
·
·
Source: Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Overview of Chapter Findings
__________________________
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. reviewed the district's facilities construction program using the Best Financial Management Practices adopted by the Commissioner of Education and the associated indicators.
The consulting team employed several methodologies to develop chapter conclusions and action plans.
For instance, Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. conducted on-site interviews with district-level managers and gathered information on the facilities construction activities such as the district's facilities construction activities policies and procedures.
To receive additional input, the consultant visited several schools, spoke to school architects employed as consultants by the district and interviewed school principles and community residents.
An overview of chapter findings is presented below.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-1
Facilities Construction Facilities Work Plan 1.
The district has not established facilities planning procedures that include a broad base of school district personnel, parents, construction professionals, and other community stakeholders.
(Page 10-5) 2.
The district has not established authority and assigned responsibilities for facilities planning but some community input is solicited during the creation of the five year facilities work plan.
(Page 10-8) 3.
The five-year facilities work plan provides budgetary plans and priorities but does not contain strategies to create small community-based schools.
District priorities are not based on a master plan or input from a facilities planning committee, however it is influenced by a comprehensive document called, "Plan for Maintaining a Unitary School System."
(Page 10-9) 4.
The five-year facilities work plan is based on a thorough demographic study and enrollment projections.
(Page 10-12) 5.
The five-year facilities work plan is based on an evaluation of physical conditions but the district needs to better evaluate the ability of facilities to meet educational needs.
(Page 10-13) 6.
When developing the annual five-year facilities work plan the district evaluates alternatives to minimize the need for new construction.
(Page 10-14) 7.
District planning prioritizes construction needs.
(Page 10-15) 8.
The district can demonstrate that the construction program complies with the current laws of Florida.
(Page 10-16) 9.
For all projects with dates of construction contracted after July 1, 2001, the district can demonstrate that the construction program complies with the Florida Building Code.
(Page 10-17) 10.
The school board ensures responsiveness to the community through open communication about the construction program and the five-year facilities work plan.
(Page 10-20)
Educational Specifications 11.
The district develops descriptions and educational specifications for each project.
(Page 10-20) 12.
Educational specifications for new construction, remodeling, and renovations include a description of activity areas but the process needs to be updated to match current best practice.
(Page 10-24) 13.
The architectural design fulfills the building specification needs as determined by the district but some shortcomings are evident.
(Page 10-26) 14.
New construction, remodeling, and renovations incorporate effective safety features.
(Page 10-28)
Acquisition of School Sites 15.
The district begins school site selection well in advance of future need based on expected growth patterns.
(Page 10-28).
16.
The board considers the most economical and practical locations for current and anticipated needs, including such factors as need to exercise eminent domain, obstacles to development, and consideration of agreements with adjoining counties.
(Page 10-30)
Construction Costs 17.
The district has efficiency, and 18.
The district has in the SMART established and implemented accountability mechanisms to ensure the performance, effectiveness of the construction program.
(Page 10-31) considered, and where possible implemented, the general requirements recommended Schools Clearinghouse Frugal Construction Standards.
(Page 10-32)
10-2
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction 19.
The district minimizes construction costs through the use of prototype school designs and frugal construction practices.
(Page 10-33) 20.
The district secures appropriate professional services to assist in facility planning, design, and construction but does not do so in every case.
(Page 10-34) 21.
The district can demonstrate that funds collected for school projects were raised appropriately.
(Page 10-35)
Timely Completion of Projects 22.
District planning provides realistic time frames for implementation that are coordinated with the opening of schools.
(Page 10-36) 23.
For each project or group of projects, the architect and district facilities planner develop a conceptual site plan and building specifications.
(Page 10-37) 24.
The district follows generally accepted and legal contracting practices to control costs.
(Page 10-37) 25.
The district has assigned one person with the authority and responsibility to keep facilities construction projects within budget and on schedule.
(Page 10-38) 26.
The board minimizes changes to facilities plans after final working drawings are initiated in order to minimize project costs.
(Page 10-38) 27.
The architect recommends payment based on the percentage of work completed.
A percentage of the contract is withheld pending completion of the project.
(Page 10-39) 28.
The district requires appropriate inspection of all school construction projects.
(Page 10-39)
Construction Program 29.
The district conducts a comprehensive orientation to the new facility prior to its use so that users better understand the building design and function.
(Page 10-40) 30.
The district does not conduct comprehensive building evaluations at the end of the first year of operation and regularly during the next three to five years to collect information about building operation and performance.
Some post occupancy evaluations are done but not for every project.
(Page 10-42) 31.
The district does not routinely analyze building evaluations to determine whether facilities are fully used, operating costs are minimized, and changes in the district's construction planning process are needed.
(Page 10-43) 32.
The district analyzes maintenance and operations costs to identify improvements to the district's construction planning process but feedback loops from maintenance to construction need to be strengthened.
(Page 10-44).
Fiscal Impact of Recommendations
____________________
One of this chapter's recommendations, a wireless wide area network be piloted at 22 schools that lie within the proximity of the district administrative offices has a direct fiscal impact.
The fiscal impact of this recommendation over the next five years is $1,675,000.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-3
Facilities Construction
Exhibit 10-2
One Facilities Construction Action Plan Recommendation Has Fiscal Impacts Recommendation · Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. recommends that the district consider one viable option for improving Internet access and use in SDHC's school facilities ­ a wireless wide area network.
It is recommended that the wireless wide area network be piloted at 22 schools that lie within the proximity of the district administrative offices.
The program should be expanded if successful so that most of the school buildings in the district can have high-speed access to the Internet and the district-wide network.
This option provides schools the bandwidth they need for true connectivity without the high recurring costs that the telephone company charges.
·
Five Year Fiscal Impact If the wireless WAN option is practically feasible, it will yield a benefit equivalent to $1.9 million over the next five years with an initial investment of about $225,000.
More important, it will enable schools to realize the full benefits of Internet and intra-district network connectivity, which they do not now enjoy.
Source: Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Background
___________________________________________________
The Planning and Construction Department is responsible for all major facility improvement projects for the district.
The department consists primarily of two functional areas, project management and project inspection.
Project management includes pre-construction, construction, and post-construction activities.
On-staff architects, deemed "project coordinators", oversee the activities of program definition, needs assessment, design services, and construction administration activities.
Design services are assigned to outside consultants, typically an architect.
Construction services are assigned to a construction manager.
Project inspection is a dual faceted function.
Each member of the inspection staff is credentialed by the State for the purposes of insuring compliance with the applicable building codes.
Each inspector also serves as a quality control and contract compliance agent for the District.
The present departmental organization is the result of two former departments having been combined.
There was previously an Engineering Department that provided on-staff engineering support, and oversaw all construction activities.
In addition to administering the contract for construction, the department was responsible for compliance with all building codes.
Although nearly all construction is currently undertaken using the construction management process, prior to approximately five years ago, competitive bidding was used to select the general contractor.
The hard-bid procedure often attracted less qualified bidders, and resulted in a more contentious process, and lower quality results.
Construction management has proven a much more effective delivery method.
SDHC is in the process of effecting minor organizational refinements to achieve implementation of the new Florida Building Code and to assume certain duties previously assigned to the director of Maintenance.
10-4
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction
Exhibit 10-3
Facilities Construction Organizational Chart As sistant Supe ri nte nde nt Ope ratio ns
Ge ne ral Dire cto r Ope ratio ns
Dire cto r Pla nni ng a nd Cons t ruct io n
Ge ne ral Dire cto r Res ource Manage me nt
Dire cto r School Se rvice s
Source: The School District of Hillsborough County.
Facilities Work Plan In creating its five-year work plan, the district considers many rational criteria such as overcrowding, condition of buildings, age of facilities and legal mandates.
Community input is solicited in a variety of ways and local communities have a say in the development of particular schools.
In the area of site acquisitions, all property owners in the area are given an opportunity to comment.
Furthermore, the board meetings to discuss the five-year work plan are open to the public who are free to comment on it at that time.
Despite these measures, however, the actual five-year work plan is not designed to be informative for most local citizens.
It is more of a technical document that lists various projects and their projected budgets.
It does not contain an introduction or a philosophical statement as to the district's desired goals and objectives.
Such information, presented in a way that local citizens can understand and evaluate is more likely to elicit true and meaningful community participation in the five-year planning process.
1
The district has not established a facilities planning committee that includes a broad base of school district personnel, parents, construction professionals and other stakeholders.
The district does not have a facilities planning committee but community input is solicited at various levels.
SDHC does not meet this best practice because it does not have a facilities planning committee.
This committee is important because it provides for stakeholder, offers accountability to the public, and gives the district's plan more credibility because it has received support from members of the general community.
The Division of Operations solicits wide community input through a variety of means in the planning of school facilities and facility improvements.
For example, new site acquisitions require that all local residents be individually notified.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-5
Facilities Construction While preparing the plan, the Division of Operations consults with maintenance personnel, unit Area Directors, a Citizens Advisory Committee and a Diversity Roundtable.
However, the plan is largely developed on the basis of various objective criteria such as enrollment projections, educational priorities and existing facilities conditions.
In this regard, the district does not consult with a standing committee that is broadly representative of the community brought together for the specific purpose of planning.
Again, while it is clear that SDHC does not meet this best practice, school district staff who are responsible for the preparation of the five-year facilities work plan: · · · · · Have access to knowledgeable facilities planning, design, and construction professionals.
Have access to accurate information regarding local land use and growth restrictions.
Are responsive to needs expressed by the business community.
Address the feasibility and cost-effectiveness of alternative program solutions.
Meet regularly to review the status of work on the long-range plan for the previous year, to consider any changing parameters, and to make recommendations to the school board for adjustments to the long-range plan.
A facilities plan includes a schedule of all major repairs, renovations and new construction projects.
In compliance with Florida Statute 235, the district has adopted a five-year work plan.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. has reviewed various versions of the work plan and its supporting documentation including the board agenda item describing the plan.
This plan includes a schedule of all major repairs, renovations and new construction projects planned, and information about the use and elimination of portable classrooms in the school district.
The school board approves the five-year work plan annually with an additional year added as each year is completed.
All projects are evaluated against pre-established criteria.
In order to develop the five-year work plan, the district has established procedures to evaluate enrollment projections relative to current capacity, budget realities, non-construction alternatives and required legal mandates.
One of the reports that the district prepares graphically denotes how many of the following criteria apply to each proposed project as part of the five-year facilities work plan: · · · · · · · · · Provides for infill and redevelopment Investment in African-American neighborhood Investment in Hispanic neighborhood Supports Unitary Status Plan Preserves historic structure Co-located with other public facilities Part of approved development Found consistent with comprehensive plan pursuant to interlocal agreements Provides for growth
Facilities plan maintained as Excel files.
The five-year plan is prepared and updated manually and input into various Excel files.
While this process is less efficient for the purposes of running reports than a database application would be, there is no evidence that the district has been unable to prepare and submit all legally mandated reports relating to
10-6
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction the five-year plan.
The district will soon maintain its five-year plan information online in a system set up by the Florida State Department of Education (DOE).
Outside professionals are involved in five-year planning process.
The district has hired the consulting firm Wilson Miller to develop population projections and also research growth factors such as housing development.
The district also receives this kind of information from the planning commission that it factors into decisions regarding the construction of new schools.
SDHC does not have a standard measure of its building conditions.
Lacking a standard index that can be used to measure the condition of each school building, SDHC does not have the ability to do across-the-board comparisons of its building assets.
This makes it more difficult to plan a district-wide repair versus replacement strategy.
Without a standard index of school facility conditions, it is also more difficult to graphically demonstrate the extent of problems with school buildings and objectively document progress that has been made as a result of capital expenditures.
The district, as part of the five-year facilities plant survey, collects the basic information required to create a standard index of school facilities.
The index is a way of organizing facility information in a manner that makes it easier for the lay-public and policy makers to understand.
Recommendations ·
___________________________________________
We recommend that the district create a facilities planning committee to ensure community and stakeholder involvement in the district's facilities planning process and that the newly established committee prepare a vision statement and develop short- and long-term facility planning goals that specifically address the vision.
The noted goals should be tied to the research relative to the importance of the learning environment affecting educational outcomes.
In preparing the five- year facilities work plan, we further recommend that the district prepare an introduction that addresses how the work plan will address the stated goals.
The facilities work plan should be realistic in noting the projects sought to be achieved but also honest in terms of the actual resources that will be needed to realize the vision of the district.
The unfunded portion of the work plan should be clearly noted.
Action Plan 10-1 provides the steps needed to implement this recommendation.
Action Plan 10-1 Improving Community Participation In Five Year Planning Accountability Strategy Create a facilities planning committee to ensure community and stakeholder involvement in the district's facilities planning process and that the newly established committee prepare a vision statement and develop short- and long-term facility planning goals that specifically address the vision.
Step 1: Assign responsibility for implementing the above strategy to the superintendent.
Step 2: Establish a facilities planning committee that includes a broad base of school district personnel, parents, construction professionals, and other community stakeholders.
Step 3: Prepare a procedure that will enable the newly formed committee to participate fully in the creation of five-year facilities work plans.
Step 4: Obtain approval of the committee by the board of education.
Superintendent
Action Needed
Who Is Responsible
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-7
Facilities Construction Time Frame Fiscal Impact December, 2002 The recommendation can be completed with existing resources.
Source: Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
2
The district has not established authority and assigned responsibilities for facilities planning but some community input is solicited during the creation of the five-year facilities work plan.
The facilities plan incorporates some community input but there is no standing community planning committee.
The adopted plan contains budgetary plans and priorities.
Internal processes are consistent with this best practice by virtue of professional staff having access to the needed resources including community input for effective planning - but this is mostly at the project level.
No standing committee of community representatives has been established for the purpose of preparing a five-year facilities work plan.
The facilities plan is prepared and submitted by the assistant superintendent for Operations.
The assistant superintendent for Operations and the deputy superintendent for Instructional Support oversee the development and submit the district's five-year work plan for board approval.
The board has not delegated any authority for this function to a community-based facility planning committee though, as noted earlier, there are opportunities for community input.
Comprehensive assessment by district staff precedes and is the basis for plan preparation.
District staff responsible for preparing the five-year facilities plan is diligent in: · · · Properly evaluating existing facilities; Assessing planning goals and objectives; Reviewing educational programs from the perspective of facility design; and
Preparing comprehensive guidelines and educational specifications for use by the architect.
The district's website maintains a list of current project assignments coded by inspectors.
Inspectors are assigned to specific geographic regions.
Project coordinators meet and review the status of their projects with area directors and food service managers for each area.
Duties within the division are regularly re-evaluated.
Management meets every week to review ongoing procedures, board agenda items, etc. which is another forum in which changes can be implemented.
The district has recently completed a reorganization plan for the Planning and Construction Department in order to ensure compliance with the new Florida Building Code.
Planning operations are efficient.
The district staff responsible for planning is also responsible for implementing the plan.
A staff of 24 persons is responsible for executing an $800 million five-year facilities work plan.
Efficient and effective
10-8
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction management of the planning and construction operation is possible because the Division of Operations has hired qualified professionals and delegated the appropriate authority to them.
This has not precluded senior managers from being involved in important decisions that require their input.
The recommendation associated with best practice number 1 above will address the problems raised in the above discussion.
3
The five-year facilities work plan provides budgetary plans and priorities.
District priorities are not based on a master plan or input from a facilities planning committee, however it is influenced by a comprehensive document called, "Plan for Maintaining a Unitary School System."
District's current plan was last updated and approved in September 2001 is not associated with a master plan but is based on its "Plan for Maintaining a Unitary School System."
The district's current five-year work plan was submitted by the assistant superintendent for Operations and the deputy superintendent for Instructional Support on September 4, 2001 and approved by the board on that date.
It is not associated with a master plan but is based on its "Plan for Maintaining a Unitary School System."
The five-year facilities work plan identifies sources of funds and itemizes costs.
The Five-Year Facilities Work Plan identifies sources of funds and itemizes the costs of facility needs such as site purchase, new construction, remodeling, renovation, the long-term use of portables, site improvement and deferred maintenance.
For every project, the school board approval represents a "not-to-exceed" cost.
Budget estimates in the plan are reliable to the extent that such order-of-magnitude numbers can be reliable.
Accuracy of estimates in the five-year plan vary as should be expected from a budgeting document whose numbers cannot have the same accuracy as estimates based on actual project scopes.
The district does use the Consumer Price Index (CPI) to adjust project costs in the out years.
The escalation factors used by the district are prepared in Tallahassee and made available to them by the DOE's Office of Educational Facilities.
Actual project costs may vary from the amounts shown in the five-year plan, but are not a concern because each individual contract must be brought back to the board for approval.
A more important measure is the district's compliance with its budgets after projects are contracted - in this area, the district has a good record given its change order record for new schools of about two percent.
For major renovation projects, change orders are about five percent.
This is in accordance with information provided to Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. by SDHC.
By way of comparison, New York City sets aside an eight percent of construction costs as a change order contingency for new schools and 12.5 percent for major renovations based on its past experience with actual change order costs incurred on these kinds of projects.
District has a strong rationale for its prioritization decisions.
There is an understanding that the five-year plan is driven by the availability of funds and not by the extent of needs.
Given the funding realities, there will always be some needs that cannot be met.
This makes the district's prioritization of needs very important.
The district has developed a rational system to
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-9
Facilities Construction prioritize projects.
Generally speaking, older schools that have had no work done within the last 20 years get priority.
Part four of the five-year plan lays out fiscal resources.
Part five and seven of the plan shows projects that will not be funded.
Priorities have shifted from new construction to renovation and maintenance.
A few years ago, the focus of the district in its five-year planning exercise was on creating the required number of student stations to address the gross overcrowding that the district was facing.
Today, that focus has shifted somewhat and there is a greater emphasis on maintaining and preserving existing schools.
By the end of the current five-year plan, all overcrowded schools will be eliminated even allowing for growth of about two percent per year.
It is true that the district does not undertake routine examination of the cost differentials between modernization and the opening of new schools.
However, this problem is largely mitigated by that fact that, in prioritizing its work on older schools, the district has scheduled a major renovation at each of its schools that are 30 years old or older ­ but have not had a major renovation in the past 10 years.
The district looks to spend no more than 50 percent of the cost of new construction at these facilities as a way of ensuring that existing schools are not renovated to the point where it would have been more appropriate to build a new school.
In deciding how much work to do and create project budgets, the district does not include any square footage built after 1990 toward these calculations.
The district's budget priorities are also affected by policy changes such as integration strategies, elimination of sixth and seventh grade centers, indoor air quality and other parameters.
All of these are factored into decision making when creating new projects.
The district reviews and amends its five-year plan at least once every year.
Sometimes, the plan is reviewed and amended during the middle of the year, which makes it easier to prepare the final document in time for the plan's annual adoption in October.
The facility condition index ­ what it is and why it can be a useful tool for SDHC.
SDHC does collect required information about the condition of its physical plant through its five-year plant survey.
However, this information does not adequately provide comparative information of its various school facilities in a way that lay persons and policy people can readily understand.
Such an understanding is critical to their ability to judge the effectiveness of the district's prioritization decisions.
Because of this realization that conditions information alone is insufficient to present a clear picture regarding the physical status of hundreds of school facilities, school districts and others responsible for building asset management across the country often use an index called the Facility Condition Index or FCI.
According to Physical Planning Technologies, an Ontario based engineering company, "The Facility Condition Index is a standard benchmark in the building industry that is used to objectively assess the current and projected condition of a building asset.
By definition, the FCI is defined as the ratio of current year required renewal cost to current building replacement value.
Building condition is often defined in terms of the FCI as follows: · · · Good - 0 to 5 percent FCI Fair - 5 to 10 percent FCI Poor - greater than 10 percent FCI
The purpose of the FCI is to provide a means for objective comparison of building condition as well as allowing senior decision makers to understand building renewal funding needs and comparisons."
10-10
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction The Ohio School Facilities Commission also uses the FCI to measure the comparative condition of the State's school facilities.
The Ohio measure is somewhat different than the general industry standard noted above.
For example, in computing the FCIs for Columbus Schools, they used a methodology that divides the total current building replacement value by the current cost to repair and renew the school facility.
Under this system, the Ohio School Facilities Commission (OSFC) recommends that school buildings with an FCI below 66.66 percent be renovated, and those with an FCI of 66.66 percent and over be replaced.
The district does not have plans to address the recent small schools requirement.
It is the public policy of the State of Florida to build small schools, beginning July 1, 2003.
Section 235.2157(2), Florida Statutes, requires all plans for new educational facilities to meet small school standards established by the Legislature.
The Legislature has found that smaller schools reduce discipline problems and crime, truancy and gang participation, dropout rates, and improve teacher and student attitudes and student self-perception.
The Legislature also found that student academic achievement equal to or superior to that of students at larger schools, and that smaller schools increase parental involvement in their child's education.
The Legislature also found that smaller schools can provide these benefits while not increasing administrative and construction costs.
Exhibit 10-4 shows a comparative chart to illustrate the school sizes that the Florida Legislature has set for school districts.
The small schools legislation includes a provision to use a school-within-a-school concept to fulfill the requirement (Florida Statutes 1013.43(1)-(4)).
Hillsborough County is using this concept in its current new schools even though these requirements do not become effective until July 1, 2003.
Exhibit 10-4
Recommended School Sizes 900 700 500
Elementary
Middle (and K-8)
High (and K-12)
Source: Section 235.2157 (2), Florida Statutes.
Appropriate authority is delegated to qualified staff.
In the area of staffing its planning efforts, the district is efficient in its planning and construction area.
A staff of 24 persons is responsible for executing an $800 million five-year work plan.
This staff-to-work ratio compares very favorably to other school districts (need peer district data here).
Management of the planning and construction operation is made efficient and effective because the Division of Operations has hired qualified professionals and delegated the appropriate authority to them.
This has not precluded senior managers from being involved in important decisions that require their input.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-11
Facilities Construction The Planning and Construction Department has a new reorganization proposal to address the requirements of the new Florida Building Code.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
Using existing information about its school facilities conditions, we recommend that SDHC develop an FCI for every school facility and that it use this index as one tool in its capital planning prioritization efforts.
We also further recommend that SDHC publish its FCI indexes on its website which should be periodically updated to reflect the changes brought about by capital improvements.
Action plan 10-2 provides the steps necessary to implement these recommendations.
Action Plan 10-2 Prioritize Capital Work and Create an FCI for every School Strategy Action Needed Create a Facility Condition Index (FCI) for each building in the school district to help with prioritizing capital work needed.
Step 1: With the help of a consultant establish a Request for Proposals (RFP) for the procurement of prioritization software.
Step 2: Purchase and implement the software.
Step 3: Train district personnel on the use of the prioritization software Step 4: With the help of a consultant establish a RFP for the evaluation of each of the buildings in the school district.
Step 5: Enter each FCI from the above evaluation into the prioritization software.
Step 6: Use the prioritization software to help in the decision process of scheduling capital work.
Assistant Superintendent for Operations October 2003 Cost of building evaluations is not included because the law already mandates such surveys in order to keep the FISH database updated.
Information needed to create FCIs is already being collected.
Who Is Responsible Time Frame Fiscal Impact
Source: Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. and the School District of Hillsborough County.
4
The five-year facilities work plan is based on a thorough demographic study and enrollment projections.
The district estimates facilities needs based upon enrollment projections.
The district regularly updates its enrollment projections, which are then compared to available capacity to determine building utilization rates.
The district ensures that new construction does not result in creating an inventory of student stations that is in excess of the Capital Outlay Full Time Equivalent (COFTE) students projected by the DOE. COFTE projections used by the district do not include pre-kindergarten students and are based on cohort projections from the annual live births rates within the school district.
10-12
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction The district's budget supports the funding of demographic and planning studies.
The district has hired a planning consultant, Wilson Miller to assist with demographic and planning analyses required to support the projects in the five-year facilities work plan.
The district also employs its own staff to gather information about current and projected enrollments.
Factors considered include data provided by the Florida Department of Education, district boundaries and city/county comprehensive plans.
Enrollment projections consider a variety of factors.
In computing enrollment projects, the district considers factors such as land use, geographical limitations and developable land, local ordinances that regulate growth, as well as economic conditions such as projected private and public development.
Using its estimates for enrollment projections, the District has been very successful in addressing the overcrowding problem.
Five years ago, 57 schools were considered "critically" overcrowded ­ that means they had utilization rates in excess of 120 percent.
Today the number of critically overcrowded schools has been reduced to 19.
This is despite the fact that the district as a whole grew by about 18,000 students during this same period.
5
The five-year facilities work plan is based on an evaluation of the physical condition of facilities to meet educational needs.
Fish Data is the basis for physical condition evaluations.
The report is used in conjunction with facility site reviews as the basis for evaluating the physical condition of facilities.
The district has conducted independent assessments at four schools to verify the accuracy of FISH data that was deemed to be very reliable in the area of inventories.
Physical inspections supplement the use of FISH data.
Every school building is evaluated every year for compliance with safety requirements.
This includes checks for fire, sanitation and casualty (cracked sidewalks, etc.) compliance.
Structural inspections are not conducted annually and this may be something the district should consider.
All inspection reports are on paper - this may be worth computerizing for easy follow-up and compliance reviews.
All safety violations are categorized as imminent hazard, serious and other.
The safety category determines how quickly the problems are fixed.
Special precautions are taken to ensure safety during construction.
The primary mission here is to separate school and construction operations.
If there is an imminent hazard, work is stopped until the problem is fixed.
Six inspectors are assigned to verify safety compliance.
Other routine checks include Asbestos Hazard Emergency Response Act (AHERA) inspections as required by law every three years and also tests for indoor air quality (IAQ), radon, lead and hazardous wastes.
Input from maintenance influences selection of capital projects.
Maintenance and operational feedback do influence the materials specified.
Feedback loops are stronger in some areas such as Heating, Ventilation and Air Conditioning (HVAC) than in others.
For example, there is little feedback with regard to architectural features and roof systems.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-13
Facilities Construction Uniform checklists are used in some areas.
The best practice discussion about site acquisition confirms that SDHC uses checklists to confirm that site acquisition conforms to State Requirements for Educational Facilities (SREF).
Other items such as acoustics and equipment are also based on required legal mandates.
For example, state law requires that three separate HVAC systems be considered for each new school and the most efficient system be selected.
This is also true in the area of fire safety where legal mandates govern.
Some areas do not use life cycle costing.
In the area of aesthetics, there is no uniform checklist.
This creates a situation where inexpensive materials with higher life-cycle costs are sometimes used in order to save on initial costs and qualify for SIT awards.
One example of this is the use of high-maintenance stucco exteriors instead of brick.
With capital construction intended to last a longtime, it is often shortsighted to make material selections and other design decisions such the selection of electrical, mechanical and plumbing systems based on initial cost.
Sometimes, it is better to select materials that may have a higher initial cost when such expenditures can be justified by lower life-cycle cost.
The current system of rewarding school districts with SIT funds purely on the basis of first costs serves as a disincentive to use the life-cycle costing approach.
In the case of SDHC, Gibson Consulting did not find any pervasive effort to cut costs by building inferior quality schools but the district admits that when financial pressures mount, there is the possibility that life cycle costing will give way to lower initial costs.
Automation of Florida Inventory of School Houses (FISH) data.
Managers from SDHC have attended training sessions about Florida Inventory of School Houses (FISH) conducted by the DOE.
According to the rules now in effect, the responsibility to update information in the FISH database has shifted from the state to the district.
In the past, inspectors from the state visited schools once every five years to produce the inventory.
The next survey must be conducted by SDHC in 2003.
In the meantime, to verify the reliability of existing FISH data, SDHC staff conducted an assessment of four schools - Alonzo High School, Childs Elementary, McKitrick Elementary and Simms Elementary.
Out of the four schools evaluated, only one room at one school was mislabeled.
Given the small size of the schools surveyed, it is not possible to extrapolate that FISH data district-wide is accurate.
However, as responsibility for maintaining accurate information shifts to the district, the value of larger surveys to verify accuracy of existing data is questionable.
FISH data maintained by the district contain three main components of information.
The first, school inventory, is highly accurate as demonstrated by the above review.
The second is the physical condition information input as a result of the field survey and the third is the five-year work plan.
Reliability of condition assessments decreases as the survey ages, but the district has overcome this problem by not finalizing the specific scope of work to be done on major renovations, relying instead, on rule-of-thumb order-of-magnitude estimates.
Budgets are firmed up when the actual scope of work is developed during the design phase.
6
When developing the annual five-year facilities work plan the district evaluates alternatives to minimize the need for new construction.
The district evaluates alternatives to minimize the need for new construction.
Three primary alternatives to new construction have been reviewed and implemented as appropriate to reduce the need for new construction.
The five-year facilities plan only provides new construction in
10-14
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction areas where the implementation of available and appropriate alternatives still leaves an unmet need for additional capacity.
In some cases, alternatives were evaluated as recommended by this best practice but not implemented.
In cases where the district has chosen not to implement an alternative to new construction, it is able to justify its reasons for doing so.
Double Sessions Schools: The district has employed this methodology in several instances but based upon its experience and the needs of its community, this is not an option that the district actively pursues any more.
Double session schools have been tried without success at several locations including Bloomingdale High School, Sickles High School and Gaither High School.
Year Round Schooling: SDHC has evaluated the feasibility of year round schooling and concluded that it is not a viable financial option at this time.
The study by SDHC also looked at the experience of several other school districts that had attempted year-round schooling.
These include Marian County, Palm Beach County, Seminole County and Orange County.
All these school districts had negative experiences with the concept.
SDJC's committee concluded that various negative factors dominant so-called modified school calendar programs.
The report states that, "The basic rationale for multi-track programs of assistance in relief of overcrowding financial concerns is not only not being realized, it is often increasing costs."
1 Redesigning district boundaries and "sending areas": These measures are aggressively pursued by SDHC to reduce the need for new construction.
This has resulted in schools throughout the district being very highly utilized.
In the 2001-2002 school year alone, there have been ten different boundary changes approved which will become effective in the fall of 2002 to maximize the availability of space to students.
Further, starting in 2004, the district's unitary status plan will go into effect, which will maximize the district's ability to utilize available capacity.
Under this plan, parents will be able to send students to schools within one of seven expanded "zones" and free bussing will be provided to transport students to any school within their respective zones.
7
District planning prioritizes construction needs.
District has an equitable, objective and comprehensive prioritization system.
All projects in the five-year facilities work plan are given estimated budgets.
They are also prioritized in accordance with a number of factors with highest priority projects completed first.
The district's prioritization criteria for the construction of new schools include overcrowding to determine areas where the need for new space is the greatest.
In the area of renovations, the physical condition of schools and the age of school buildings are taken into account.
The district has a policy that requires older school buildings that have not had any major renovation within the past twenty years to be included for renovation in the five-year facilities work plan.
FISH reports are used to determine physical condition and other inventory data within these buildings in order to determine the priority order in which renovations will occur.
Site selection is also done from a perspective of relieving overcrowding at as many existing schools as possible.
The assistant superintendent of operations also provides a full accounting of the use of all capital funds to the Board.
1 Modified School Calendar Report, June 1995 presented to the School Board, School District of Hillsborough County, Florida by Coordinating Committee, Modified School Calendar Task Force
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-15
Facilities Construction
8 · · · · · · · ·
The district can demonstrate that the construction program complies with the current Laws of Florida.
The district submits the required annual reports to the Department of Education Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. has verified that all required reports are submitted including Financial Reports that are required to get reimbursements and awards from the state.
These include: Survey for Validation (s. 235.15, Florida Statutes) Project Implementation Information for projects over $200,000 (SREF 4.1 (97)) Certificate of Occupancy (s. 235.26(c), Florida Statutes) Certificate of Final Inspection for projects over $200,000 (s. 235.26 (c), Florida Statutes) Project Priority List for use of CO
Additionally, the following Optional Reports are also submitted: · · · Letter of Transmittal, Facility Space Chart, and Life Cycle Cost Analysis for projects with department plan review assistance (SREF and s. 235.26, Florida Statutes) Capital Outlay Bond Issue Form for participation in CO
Projected cash disbursements for projects funded from lottery proceeds The district's construction process complies with the Florida Building Code and uses criteria that comply with the Florida Building Code to identify instructional areas or teaching stations and also the number of students assigned to each teaching station.
The district builds frugal and efficient schools and the cost of construction does not exceed the amount legally allowed peer student station.
Not only does the district build schools whose costs are within the legal limits per student station, but also they almost always spend less than the state limits and qualify for reimbursement (SIT awards) for frugal construction practices.
District financial transactions are routinely audited by the state.
In a report done by the district, SDHC sets forth the S.I.T. Award/Distribution summary.
This report shows how much was earned by each school and the manner in which these funds were expended.
2
2
S.I.T. Award/Distribution Summary, School District of Hillsborough County, February 8, 2002
10-16
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction
9
For all projects with dates of construction contracted after July 1, 2001, the district can demonstrate that the construction program complies with the Florida Building Code (FBC).
3
District will comply with code provisions that become effective March 1, 2002.
Three steps have been taken by the district in preparation for compliance with the new Florida Building Code that will become effective on March 1, 2002.
· · · the district has identified the projects the come under the new building code the district has hired or has on staff qualified personnel to oversee meeting the new building code the district has reorganized to effectively meet the new building code requirements.
Architects are legally bound to produce code-complying designs and the district verifies that this is being done.
This best practice refers to legislation, which will become effective on March 1, 2002.
At the commencement of planning for each project the architect is charged with the responsibility of code compliance.
Employees are properly licensed or certified as required by code and acquire the appropriate continuing education credits they need.
Departmental reorganization to implement the Florida Building Code will start January 1, 2002.
The proposed organizational structures are described below.
Compliance with the new FBC will be achieved with the establishment of a semi-autonomous FBC office within the Department of Planning 
The office will have two basic responsibilities: 1) Examination of design and construction documents prior to construction to insure compliance with all applicable codes, and 2) Inspection of all construction activities to insure adherence to the approved documents and compliance with all applicable codes.
The process of plan review is very time-consuming and specialized in nature.
Project coordinators are trained to be generalists and are hired for their managerial skills.
It is not a good investment to use project coordinators who already carry a significant workload for plan examination.
This will keep them in the office instead of at important job meetings or supervising the work of consultants and construction personnel.
Recognizing these issues, even though the existing Project Coordinators can qualify to be plan examiners by virtue of their licensure as registered architects and professional engineers, the district has decided its interests will be better served by assigning these duties to independent consultants, on a project-by-project basis.
The director will serve as the interim ex officio Building Codes Administrator as required by the FBC.
The manager of the Building Code Compliance office would be a new position, and should eventually assume this duty.
3
Please note date for compliance with the new Florida Building Code has been changed to March 1, 2002.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-17
Facilities Construction
Exhibit 10-5
Planned Organizational Structure of the Building Code Compliance Office Dire cto r
Architects Pro je ct Coo rdi nato rs
Eng i neers Civil, Ele ct ri cal a nd M e chanical
Buil ding Co de Co mplia nce (one ne w e mploye e
Plans Examine r (outs i de cons ulta nts ) Source: The School District of Hillsborough County.
Ins pe cto rs (e xis ting s taff)
Reorganization ­minor projects.
Implementation of the new FBC will require closer monitoring of all maintenance, food service, and alumni/parent projects to assure compliance.
These new requirements can be best accomplished with a single entity responsible for all projects subject to the FBC requirements, regardless of scope or complexity.
SDHC proposes the establishment of an Office of Minor Projects (OMP) within the Department of Planning 
The OMP would oversee all aspects of all scheduled minor capital outlay projects, including budgeting, scheduling, consultants, procurement.
The establishment of the OMP would be accomplished with existing resources and staff.
Exhibit 10-6
Planned Organizational Structure of the Office of Minor Project Department Dire cto r
Majo r Pro jects
Off ice of M ino r Pro je cts (e xis ting s taff)
Buil di ng Co de Co mpl ia nce
Me chanical
Ele ct ri cal
Civi l Source: The School District of Hillsborough County.
Reorganization­facilities management.
The district has determined that the efficient management of its inventory of facilities can be better assured by creating a "clearinghouse" function wherein all capital improvements would be coordinated.
10-18
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction Accordingly, SDHC proposes the consolidation of all major facility efforts under the purview of the Planning 
This will be accomplished by the alignment of the Project Coordinators with the Administrative Areas for the management of existing facilities.
Project Coordinators would be responsible for the condition and utilization of the facilities in their assigned Administrative Areas.
This will include scheduled renovations, additions, portable locations, wetlands maintenance, warranties, FISH, etc.
Exhibit 10-7
Planned Organizational Structure of the Office of Minor Project Department Dire cto r
Majo r Pro jects
Off ice of M ino r Pro je cts
Buil di ng Co de Co mpl ia nce
Are a 1 Archite ct
Area 2 Architect
Are a 3 Archite ct
Area 4 Architect
Are a 5 Archite ct
Area 6 Architect (ne w pos itio n)
Are a 7 Archite ct (ne w pos itio n) Source: The School District of Hillsborough County.
The following chart illustrates the resulting functional organization of the Department after the planned reorganization.
Exhibit 10-8
Planned Organizational Structure of the Planning and Construction Department Dire cto r
Majo r Pro jects
Off ice of M ino r Pro je cts
Buil di ng Co de Co mpl ia nce
Area 1 Architect A rea 3 Architect Area 5 Architect A rea 7 Architect
A rea 2 Architect A rea 4 Architect
Me chanical
Ele ct ri cal
Plans Exami ne rs
Ins pe cto rs
Civi l
A rea 6 Architect
Source: The School District of Hillsborough County.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-19
Facilities Construction
10
The school board ensures responsiveness to the community through open communication about the construction program and the five-year facilities work plan.
School board holds regular open hearings, timely notice is given and a clear explanation of each construction project is given.
All board hearings contemplating the five-year plan and any action to be taken about it are public and the community is encouraged to participate in board meetings on all aspects related to the five-year facilities work plan.
Agenda items include details about the construction program and the application for and the receipt of SIT awards.
In addition, public meetings are scheduled for each renovation project to get input before any work starts.
Public meetings are also initiated for site selection.
Additionally, information about the five-year work plan is posted on the district web site.
Public meetings and community input is also solicited for related matters such as the creation of proposed attendance boundaries for new schools.
Educational Specifications In order to better understand the district's effectiveness at meeting this goal, the following discussion provides information about the connection between educational specifications and how it's development affects a school district's ability to meet student education needs.
When school planning, design and construction are driven by clear educational objectives it will be possible to create learning environments that work for each learner.
The key is to set forth all goals and objectives as early in the development process as possible.
These will serve as benchmarks to gauge the validity of each decision that is made during the process of planning, designing, constructing and running a school.
11
The design of a school facility has a measurable impact on educational outcomes.
The district develops descriptions and educational specifications for each project.
During the development of educational specifications, much of the decision-making regarding the eventual design of the school occurs.
Educational specifications are the documents that detail the purpose for which an educational facility will be used.
In the area of creating educational specifications, SDHC tends to use two types of processes.
The first type is individually created for magnet schools and is more in tune with the best practices discussed above.
The second is a more generic specification that is used and re-used for each new facility.
While this process has some advantages in that many of the decisions are made in advance in accordance with the district's prior experience and priorities, it is problematic insofar as creating schools that are tailored to the special and particular educational needs of a given community.
Given that schools built today must remain viable for at least the next decade during which time no significant investments can be made in the capital plant, the district needs to emulate some of the most successful processes that are available nationally and internationally for defining and creating its schools.
The district has done a commendable job in this regard for its specialized and magnet programs.
Schools
10-20
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction deserving special mention in this category are the Performing Arts Magnet Program at Blake High School and the various technical and career programs at Tampa Bay Technical High School.
Given that SDHC has expressed its vision in terms of being within the top one percent of all schools nationwide, and the high quality of its overall school facility planning and construction operation, the district is well positioned to apply the above-discussed and well established principles of school planning to its facilities program as a whole.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. spells these out in the recommendations at the end of this section.
A thorough project description is developed for each project.
Each project includes a rationale, a determination of the size of the facility and that it meets the space requirements of current laws of Florida; a determination of the grade level the facility will serve; a determination of whether the new facility will serve all parts of the district on an open enrollment basis or will be a "magnet" school or a special school; a map has been prepared that shows the location of the planned facility within the community and the proposed attendance area of the school; construction budget meets the state averages or requirements of current laws of Florida relative to cost per student station; the source of funding for the project; planning and construction time line; durability and maintenance costs; an estimate plan for the time of construction; the date of completion and opening.
District tailors a standard Educational Specification for each project.
The district uses a standard educational specifications template that is tailored for each project.
The standard specification is posted on the district web site.
The completed educational specification is distributed to the architect and designers.
It is developed in collaboration with user groups.
Authors of the final document are the users but their ability to customize the end product is severely limited.
The process is a typical, traditional educational specification model.
Using information from the five-year work plan, maintenance records, and enrollment data, scope of work or schedule of spaces are prepared for each project.
The district's educational specifications contain many standard components.
Planning and construction staff researches specific district needs regarding all projects and makes whatever adjustments they can to the prototype plans.
The district has a strong and innovative technology group that helps identify ways to incorporate the latest technology into buildings.
Good coordination between the Planning and Construction group and the Technology group has resulted in the elimination of stand-alone computer labs ­ which has been a significant cost savings to the district.
District pays attention to future teaching methods and management styles in specialized schools, but needs to expand such efforts to all schools.
Some attention has been given to providing flexibility in order to accommodate future teaching methods and future management styles.
In the course of several site visits, Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. was able to see that specialized programs such as the performing arts program at Blake High School and the various hands-on programs housed at Tampa Bay Technical High School are well supported by the facilities in which they are housed.
As for the non-specialized schools, the district to do more toward creating the kinds of school facilities that are more responsive to the established education research.
The district has begun to take some steps in that direction in one important area - technology.
For example, SDHC has recognized that the flexibility and mobility offered by wireless laptop computers benefits modern-day schools far more than the old system of putting a limited number of fixed computers in every classroom and relegating most serious computing activity to a lab.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-21
Facilities Construction School-community relationships are addressed.
Gibson Consulting has verified many instances where SDHC's school planning process allows for parent and community participation.
Examples include cooperation with the PTA on the issue of a play court cover at dale Mabry HS, meetings with the public on the design of Plant High School, and involvement of the Middleton Alumni Association during the design of that high school.
However, these partnerships do not always rise to the level of meaningful community participation as defined by the best practice literature and research in this area.
SDHC also coordinates with other agencies like, parks, libraries, cultural affairs, etc.
The needs and design implications of advanced technology such as computers, integrated networks and satellite transmissions and reception are not fully identified in the school building design standards which preclude them from taking full advantage of the educational benefits of Internet connectivity.
Research shows that schools that have developed educational programs that tap into the vast resources of the Internet have measurably enhanced student outcomes.
In Hillsborough County, the advances made over the past few years to bring Internet connectivity to a majority of its classrooms have not yet yielded significant and measurable improvements in student performance.
In fact, classroom connectivity is more of a theoretical than practical reality.
Consider this.
A majority of schools have Internet connectivity at a paltry 256kbps.
Users must then share this bandwidth across the school.
It is easy to see how simultaneous use by even 30 students in one computer lab will reduce the available bandwidth to levels far below those available in most homes running off a 56kbps modem.
Add to this, the district's goals of providing wireless access to students via laptop computers and it becomes immediately evident that available bandwidth limitations make any kind of Internet-based educational program impractical and nearly impossible.
Given these limitations, the district is hard-pressed to implement its educational objectives at the school level and is also unable to effectively distribute other content via the wide area network or provide services such as distance learning or distributed media.
One solution to this problem is to buy more bandwidth from the telephone company.
The best, most suitable and most reliable way to get the level of bandwidth that each school needs to have inter-school and school to district connectivity is for each school to have a T3 fiber connection.
Today, however, a T3 connection running at 150 mbps will cost the school about $2,400/month in telephone company connection fees - a recurring amount that the school district will be hard pressed to pay.
The next option is to get a T1 connection at 1.5 mbps (a pipe that is 100 times smaller than a T3 connection).
This will cost each school about $465/month.
A third option is to get multiple T1 lines - say three or four - which will provide 6mbps but cost about $1,800/month.
All of the above options come with recurring monthly fees that the district has currently decided it cannot incur.
Information Services has established a track record of reviewing new technologies and innovative methods of integrating technologies into the school district.
Increasing WAN bandwidth initiatives that are in the process of being reviewed include; Wireless WAN connections, DSL, Cable Modems and lobbying legislature to reduce tariff rates of dedicated leased lines.
The "Leased Wireless WAN Internet Access" RFP release December 11, 2000 was recalled for several reasons including; wireless standards being developed, requirement for centralized filtering, security and available funding.
The strategic direction of increasing WAN bandwidth is to utilize high-speed wireless connections thus avoiding the high reoccurring monthly costs in combination with existing redundant low-speed leased lines for high availability.
10-22
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction
Recommendations ·
___________________________________________
We recommend that SDHC consider one viable option for improving Internet access and use in SDHC's school facilities ­ a wireless wide area network.
It is recommended that the wireless wide area network be piloted at 22 schools that lie within the proximity of the district administrative offices.
The program should be expanded if successful so that most of the schools buildings in the district can have high-speed access the Internet and the districtwide network.
This option provides schools the bandwidth they need for true connectivity without the high recurring costs that the Telephone Company charges.
Today, the district already buys an OC-3 connection running at 150 mbps at its district headquarters located at 901 E. Kennedy Blvd.
There are a total of 22 school buildings located within the proximity of the Kennedy Blvd.
HQ.
That means, if the district can find a way to share this bandwidth with the 22 schools without using the telephone company wiring, it can not only achieve up to 10 mbps speeds at each school (40 times the bandwidth currently available at each school) but also do so without incurring any per-school fees.)
Exhibit 10-9
SDHC Wireless Wide Area Network-Cost Analysis Number 1 2 3 4 5
Option Current T3 Line Per School T1 Line Per School 4 T1 Lines Per Schoo Wireless (IEEE 802.11g or 802.11a)
First Cost Recurring Cost Bandwidth None None None l None $220,000* $64,000/year $686,400/year $122,760/year $491,040/year $15,000/year** 256kbps 150,000kbps 1,500kbps 6,000kbps 10,000kbps
Payback None - recurring expense None - recurring expense None - recurring expense None - recurring expense Less than six months.
when compared to option four
*Current estimate of $6,000 per site provided by vendors for the 11mbps equipment has been inflated to account for the higher anticipated cost of the 54 mbps equipment ** Allowance for maintenance - adjustment of antennas, etc.
Source: Gibson Consulting Group Inc. and the School District of Hillsborough County
With the IEEE 802.11g standard that was recently approved, it is now possible to wirelessly transmit data at the rate of 54mbps over the airwaves.
Furthermore, the transmissions occur over unlicensed 2.5 or 5 GHz channels, which means no federal bureaucracy to deal with and no licensing fees either.
As for first time installation costs? As it turns out, the new standards will permit low cost installations of rooftop antennas and permits hi-speed transmissions over long distances.
That means the cost of installing a wireless wide area network could run between $176,000 and $220,000 ($8,000 to $10,000 per site) and allow schools that are farthest from the HQ building to enjoy the same bandwidth as schools located near the Kennedy building.
Exhibit 10-9 shows how this one time cost for installation will be recouped in a matter of six months when compared to multiple T1 lines (the most appropriate comparison).
Of course, the financial benefits of the wireless option make a compelling argument for utilizing this approach.
However, the most important reason for adopting this approach is that it will finally make the dream of true inter-building and Internet connectivity a reality.
Collateral benefits include the ability to easily hook up existing portables into the system wirelessly and, over the long tern, provide high-bandwidth connections to individual students in their homes who live within the proximity of neighborhood schools.
The millions of dollars
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-23
Facilities Construction of e-rate and district monies that have been spent by SDHC to date will finally be able to realize clear and measurable educational benefits once a high-speed wide area network is in place using wireless connectivity.
Action Plan 10-3 provides the steps needed to implement these recommendations.
Action Plan 10-3 Increase Bandwidth Of Wide Area Network (WAN) Strategy Action Needed Continue to evaluate emerging technologies to increase available bandwidth throughout the WAN and implement those that are cost effective.
Step 1: Create an RFP for increased bandwidth following E-Rate requirements and district requirements.
Step 2: Perform a cost analysis of the responding vendor solutions.
Step 3: Develop plan for reviewing cost-benefits of WAN infrastructure.
Step 4: Select vendor and establish pilot programs.
Step 5: Implement successful programs.
Assistant Superintendent for Business and Information Technology December 2002 If the wireless WAN option is practically feasible, it will yield a benefit equivalent to $1.9 million over the next five years with an initial investment of about $225,000.
More important, it will enable schools to realize the full benefits of Internet and intra-district network connectivity, which they do not now enjoy.
Who Is Responsible Time Frame Fiscal Impact
Source: Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. and the School District of Hillsborough County.
12 · · ·
Educational specifications for new construction, remodeling, and renovations include a description of activity areas.
Educational specifications are comprehensive but some areas need to be updated.
Comprehensive educational specifications should include information about a number of issues affecting a facility to be built.
The comprehensive educational specifications should: Describe the number of areas to be constructed, their size, their spatial relationships to one another, their purpose, and the staff who will utilize the space.
Address curriculum, staffing, and support services.
Show the results of the number and size of areas required for each purpose, based upon an analysis of current space requirements, master schedule, planned course offerings, staffing patterns, and planned student groupings.
Describe space relationship requirements for the separation of large-and small-group areas and for convenient student and staff circulation.
Address instructional support and co-curricular facilities.
Identify specific space for instructional support and pupil services programs, general support services, and special programs such as exceptional and vocational education that meets legal requirements.
Identify and describe environmental variables such as acoustical needs, visual needs, thermal requirements, and special aesthetic concerns have been identified and described.
· · · ·
10-24
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction · Identify utility needs, including water, sewer, drainage, electrical, gas, compressed air, telephone, fire alarm, conduit cable for advanced technology, closed caption television, energy management systems, and satellite dish, have been identified.
Identify storage requirements for individual activity areas and teaching stations along with extra storage space for year-round educational programs.
Identify display areas for chalkboards, tack boards, and display cases.
Identify the number, kind, and size of furniture and equipment items have been identified for each activity area.
Include emergency shelter accommodations where required.
Include a planned expansion (portables) strategy has been included.
· · · · ·
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc., identified a number of weaknesses with the district's educational specifications.
These weaknesses consisted of:
Generic standards could inhibit customization.
The number and size of areas required for each purpose is derived as the result of an analysis of current space requirements, master schedule, planned course offerings, staffing patterns, and planned student groupings.
Some of these govern more than others.
For example, there isn't as much of an opportunity to respond to how one particular school is dealing with curriculum in a given space to the extent that the requirements of that particular space are already spelled out in the generic design standard.
To some extent this level of standardization is good in that it ensures equity.
Generic standards also inhibit the consideration of non-traditional ways to meet needs such as extended day schedules, year round schools and revised grade configurations.
Sustainable design issues need higher visibility.
Environmental variables such as acoustical needs, visual needs, thermal requirements, and special aesthetic concerns are identified and described as part of the project development process.
However, the district needs to elevate sustainable design to a status of higher importance than is currently the case.
Utilities are well coordinated.
All utility needs, including water, sewer, drainage, electrical, gas, compressed air, telephone, fire alarm, conduit cable for advanced technology, closed caption television, energy management systems, and satellite dish are reviewed during planning and design and implemented as appropriate during construction.
Some of this requires coordination with other departments.
Site plans show locations of future portables and utilities.
Locations for future portables are shown on drawings for new schools.
A tie-in location for systems is provided.
It must be noted here that the district is pursuing an aggressive strategy to reduce portables because of the hurricane compliance requirement.
Existing potables must either be retrofitted or removed.
Hurricane compliant portables will be very expensive and so the district needs to come up with new strategies to deal with temporary needs.
District has adopted a Wireless standard to maximize availability of technology but new schools are not required to be "wireless ready" SDHC has recognized the value of wireless networking as a way to bring computers with network and Internet capability to more student stations than would have been possible under the older, hard-wired standard.
The district has been very proactive in this regard, getting competitive proposals from many
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-25
Facilities Construction leading vendors through its RFP process to implement wireless technologies.
Today, however, new schools are not being built with full wireless readiness.
The move to build wireless-ready schools is consistent with the district's policy.
Recommendations ·
___________________________________________
We recommend that the SDHC Planning and Construction Department work closely with the Department of Information Technology to make its new schools wireless enabled.
This recommendation could be implemented alongside a new policy to remove all classroom computers (except for a teacher's desktop or laptop) and replace with roving laptop carts.
This will recapture valuable space in the classroom that the teachers can use to reorient the physical organization of the room in a variety of learning configurations.
Action plan 10-4 provides the steps needed to implement these recommendations.
Action Plan 10-4 Consider wiring needs in future plans Strategy Action Needed Who Is Responsible Time Frame Fiscal Impact In keeping with existing policies, design all schools to be fully wireless enabled Step 1: Prepare a performance specification for wireless-enabling new schools.
Step 2: Include the specification in all new school construction bids.
Assistant Superintendent for Business and Information Technology and Director of Planning and Construction December 2002 Wireless enabling may add between $10,000 - $40,000 to the cost of each new school project.
However, with good up-front planning, wireless schools may actually be less expensive than wired schools because of the potential to reduce the number of hardwired data outlets and dedicated computer stations.
Source: Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. and the School District of Hillsborough County.
13
The architectural design fulfills the building specification needs as determined by the district but some shortcomings are evident.
There are eight indicators associated with this best practice.
Architectural plans are prepared with the following positive attributes and shortcomings with regard to these indicators.
Additional detail is provided in the follow-up discussion about some of these indicators.
1.
The district can demonstrate that the architect has drawn a schematic layout of buildings, parking, roads, and physical education playground areas to demonstrate that the sizes of these facilities meet educational and service activity requirements with the limitations noted earlier in this chapter, provides for future expansion, and conforms to the state's standards specified in current Laws of Florida.
2.
There is a description of how students, staff and visitors will arrive at and depart from the school.
Parking requirements are defined, and there are provisions for emergency vehicles and service access.
There is a provision for access by disabled persons.
Bus loading and unloading is separate from other vehicular traffic.
10-26
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction 3.
Circulation patterns, both within classrooms and between activity areas are provided but planning in this area can be improved by adopting some of the design principles embodied in award-winning designs around the country discussed earlier.
Such principles will improve the quality of the design by improving student circulation without necessarily costing more money.
4.
There are descriptions of the public address, closed-circuit television, and telephone and security systems.
In the area of computer networking, schools need to be designed up-front with the new wireless standards in mind (please see discussion and recommendation included under best practices 3, 5, 11 and 12) 5.
Safe school design concepts and security considerations are incorporated in the buildings' design and communications systems but please see the discussion about small schools under best practice number 3, which is another very effective manner in which to address safety and security in schools.
This, as noted earlier, is an area of weakness within SDHC and recommendations to address it have been provided under best practice number 3.
6.
Joint use of the facility by the community, other educational or governmental institutions is considered but here, again, a more comprehensive and holistic approach to educational specifications creation (best practices 3, 11 and 12) will improve the district's ability to forge such partnerships and joint use agreements 7.
Joint use design concepts to accommodate security energy conservation and citizen safety are included but these areas can also be improved by following the recommendations outlined under best practices 3, 5, 11 and 12.
8.
Currently, except in the case of specialized magnet schools, educational specifications for district facilities do not fully match the district's educational program goals as expressed by teachers, parents, site administrators, maintenance, safety and district administrators
Architects' plans undergo multiple reviews.
Architects' plans conform to the stated requirements.
Instructional supervisors who are invited to review the drawings verify plans.
This gives them an opportunity to review educational specifications against the actual drawings.
This kind of review is done program by program.
These reviews are performed during the schematic, design development and after preparation of construction documents.
Computer labs are integrated into media centers ­ a response to a reevaluation of the benefits of independent computer labs.
Architects prepare schematic layout of buildings, parking, roads, and physical education playground areas.
A schematic Design Brochure is prepared for all major projects and there is ample opportunity for the client groups to verify acceptability of the design though, as noted above, and in previous sections, the standardized approach limits the ability of constituents and stakeholders to have significant influence over the end product.
Joint use agreements are considered and entered into saving the county money.
The district considers joint use agreements.
Examples include placement of the Middleton High School auditorium for use by the public during non-school hours; the Pizzo/USF joint use of the administrative area; Egypt Lake Elementary's dual use with the Public Library.
The district enters into Interlocal Agreements in many situations.
Other examples include the inclusion of a community health center in concert with the county health department at Lanier Elementary and the construction of a community library in the Elementary "O" school.
These kinds of shared arrangements do save the county money.
For example, by having the local community and school share a library, the Egypt Lake school design saved the county about $500,000.
Similarly, by sharing parks, parking areas and equipment with other county agencies, the county has realized measurable savings.
The use of such arrangements needs to be expanded.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-27
Facilities Construction
14
New construction, remodeling, and renovations incorporate effective safety features.
Safety requirements are well documented and enforced.
Safety procedures are clearly spelled out in code requirements that architects are legally required to comply with in the design.
The district's in-house procedures ensure compliance with safety requirements and are thorough and well documented.
District staff addresses all issues such as indoor air quality and potential safety hazards carefully.
Improved HVAC systems and changed construction materials ensure low volatile organic compound (VOC) emissions; Science and tech labs have emergency fume evacuation systems.
All rooms in new schools are designed with cross ventilation in compliance with state law.
Code Analysis/Safety reviews are done on all renovations by the Architect/Engineer.
Site Safety Inspection Report is prepared for all construction projects.
Facility Safety Reports are incorporated in the Site Assessment Report and issued to the Architect for incorporation in the project.
Acquisition of School Sites
15
The district begins school site selection well in advance of future need based on expected growth patterns.
The district successfully utilizes a thorough, rational and consistent process for acquiring sites.
Timely delivery of schools is aided by timely acquisition of sites.
A review of procedures and several specific site selection examples indicates that this is an area of strength in the district.
This is further documented by the thorough and complete process it uses to acquire sites as described below.
This process has resulted in the district being able to obtain sites in a timely manner so that school delivery dates are not compromised by delays in acquiring sites.
The district had hired a planning consultant firm to help with population and enrollment projections that are useful to determine the locations where future sites should be acquired.
Exhibit 10-10
The New School Site Acquisition Process is Timely School High Schools Alonso Middleton Freedom South County Career Center D.W. Waters Career Center
Site Proposed 1 1 1 1 998 998 999 998
Site Acquired 1 1 1 1 999 998-02 999 999 1
Year Opening Originally Anticipated 8/01 2011 2009 2002 2002
Certificate of Occupancy 6/01 7/02 8/02 7/02 5/02
Classes Actually Began 8/01 8/02 8/02 8/02 8/02
Conclusions 
1999 (Proposed change from office to school)
1915 (Site was owned by district)
10-28
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction Year Opening Originally Anticipated 2007 2005 2006 2009 2006 2001
School Middle Schools Randall Davidsen Martinez Farnell Liberty Memorial
Site Proposed 1998 1996 1998 2000 1999 1998 (for conversion to middle school)
Site Acquired 1999 1998 1998 2000-021 1999 2000 Initial site of 9.5 acres already owned and developed 1997 1999 1998 1999 1999 1996 2000-021 2001 2001 Already owned and developed
Certificate of Occupancy 5/00 7/00 3/02 7/02 7/02 8/00
Classes Actually Began 8/00 8/00 8/02 8/02 8/02 8/00
Conclusions 
Elementary Schools Westchase 1995 Pride 1998 Bevis 1998 Symmes 1999 McKitrick 1999 Chiles 1996 Bryant 2000 Cimino 2001 Ippolito 2001 Oak Grove 1998 (for conversion to elementary school)
2004 2006 2006 1995 2006 2010 2004 2010 2009 2004
12/98 8/00 8/00 8/01 8/01 8/01 7/02 7/02 7/02 8/01
1/99 8/00 8/00 8/01 8/01 8/01 8/02 8/02 8/02 8/01
>
Source: The School District of Hillsborough County
Site selection activity is separate from the rest of the project development process precisely because it is a long-lead item and could potentially impact project delivery.
SDHC ties its site selection activities to future need based on expected growth patterns and even has a land banking program so that sites can be available when needed.
That is why SDHC has had no projects delayed as a result of site acquisition not being completed on time.
District's site selection criteria.
There are five indicators associated with this best practice.
The following discusses the district's compliance with the indicators.
This is further documented by a description of the procedures that the district follows to acquire sites.
a.
The district does not utilize a facilities planning committee to review potential sites because it does not presently have such a committee.
However, the superintendent's staff and the Board Attorney review all sites.
Additionally, neighborhood meetings are conducted to review the appropriateness of each site.
Each site is also subject to a Consistency Determination by the County Administrator.
b.
The district can demonstrate that the site acquisition met the requirements of Section 235.054, 235.19 and 235.193, Florida Statutes, and Section 1.4(2), State Requirements for Educational Facilities (SREF) and followed basic acquisition procedures (see detailed process below).
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-29
Facilities Construction c.
The district can demonstrate that site selection criteria were established prior to the identification of potential sites and include future consideration of construction and operational costs.
d.
The district can demonstrate that the site selected meets the previously established selection criteria.
e.
The district can demonstrate that environmental studies are conducted and the property is certified as free of environmental hazards before purchasing.
Appraisals and due diligence reports ensure compliance with applicable laws.
The district can demonstrate that site acquisition meets the requirements of Sections 235.054, 235.19, and 235.193, Florida Statutes, and Section 1.4(2), and followed basic acquisition procedures.
Checks and balances are in place as due diligence reports are prepared by the district and reviewed by the Board.
These are spelled out in the detailed site acquisition procedure described above.
Additionally, the district also obtains appraisals and prepares interlocal agreements where opportunities for sharing facilities and land are identified.
Land banking has helped to make sure that sites are available when needed.
Using a vigilant system of land banking, the district has generally managed to keep its site acquisition process from interfering with its ability to deliver schools on time.
As shown in Exhibit 10-9, our review of 21 school construction projects found that the district completed site acquisition for 16 of these projects more than 5 years prior to the originally anticipated school opening date.
In addition, we determined that the site acquisition process did not contribute to delays in school opening for the remaining 5 school construction projects.
However, as sites become scarcer and good sites in districts where schools are most needed become very difficult to find, the district will need to depend even more on innovative strategies like building smaller schools and sharing facilities.
Environmental clean up is always done prior to site acquisition.
The district is diligent in conducting phase I environmental assessments to ensure that all potential environmental problems are identified prior to purchase.
Sites will not transfer to district ownership unless the owner has completed all required clean-ups.
In rare cases where the transfer must be made before the clean up is complete, the district requires the seller to place clean-up funds in an escrow account.
16
The board considers the most economical and practical locations for current and anticipated needs, including such factors as need to exercise eminent domain, obstacles to development, and consideration of agreements with adjoining counties.
In selecting sites for new schools, the district has shown that it considers all-important factors such as the ability to obtain sites without resorting to eminent domain, and potential obstacles to development.
In one recent example, for Middleton High School, over 200 sites were obtained and only one property had to be acquired via eminent domain.
Discussions with adjoining counties occurs whenever appropriate though this is not a major factor in a large district like SDHC which has enough students to fully populate every school it builds.
When necessary, the district has meetings with Southwest Florida Water Management District and other agencies as a routine part of its site acquisition process.
By following the above-listed comprehensive process for site selection and acquisition:
10-30
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction · · · The district's determination of the most economical and practical locations compares favorably with its established criteria and its ranking of potential sites.
The district properly anticipates and evaluates obstacles to development.
The board determines that it is or is not willing to pursue condemnation to acquire selected sites.
Construction Costs The district has been very successful in keeping initial construction costs low.
Careful attention to frugal construction practices has allowed SDHC to qualify for about $20 million in SIT awards over the past five years.
The major concern in this area is that the focus on initial construction expenditures that the SMART schools initiative encourages works counter to the goal of constructing buildings that have the best overall life cycle costs.
For example, sometimes, the district uses high-maintenance materials such as stucco instead of highly durable and low maintenance materials such as brick and stone to save money up front.
Not only will this strategy end up costing the district more in the long run, but it also affects the quality and aesthetics of the facility throughout its life.
However, given the financial incentives to think short-term, it is hard to fault the district for trying to get as much state funding as possible.
17
The district has established and implemented accountability mechanisms to ensure the performance, efficiency, and effectiveness of the construction program.
District has clearly stated goals and measurable objectives The district's five-year facilities work plan clearly sets forth what the program intends to achieve.
It sets forth the projects intended to be accomplished, a rationale for their inclusion, the dates when the projects will begin and be complete and the cost of the project.
These are all measurable objectives and the district is successful at accomplishing them as demonstrated by their track record of completing schools on time, and within budget.
The district uses appropriate performance and cost efficiency measures and benchmarks such as gross square feet per student, dollars per gross square foot and change order costs and qualification for S.I.T. awards to evaluate the program and uses these in management decision-making The district regularly evaluates the performance and cost of the program and analyzes potential cost savings of alternatives, such as outside contracting and privatization.
In fact, a majority of the services provided by the Planning and Construction Department are already privatized.
Construction costs represent the most significant portion of monies spent by the district relative to facilities.
The district realizes that controlling construction costs is of primary importance.
Toward this goal, they have instituted several internal and external checks and balances to control construction costs.
Among the accountability mechanisms, the district employs the at- risk Construction Manager (at-risk CM) model that combines good management with the benefits of competitive bidding.
Internally, all contracts need to be ratified by the board of education and further, projects that exceed their budget need additional board approvals.
In the area of consultant costs, the district employs state mandated Consultant Contracting Negotiations Act (CCNA) regulations to select consultants.
Another method the district uses to keep costs down is the direct purchase of materials.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-31
Facilities Construction The district continually assesses the reliability of program performance and cost data.
Staff meets every week to assess performance and changes are made to keep both individual projects and the program as a whole on track.
When necessary, the department is reorganized to improve its effectiveness and efficiency as was done recently in response to new requirements of the Florida Building Code related reviews.
18
The district has considered, and where possible implemented, the general requirements recommended in the SMART Schools Clearinghouse Frugal Construction Standard.
Approximately $20 million in S.I.T. funds awarded to SDHC in last five years.
SMART Schools applications are submitted by the district for every new school they build.
As a result, they have received $20 million in S.I.T. awards from the state over the last five years ($16 million in the last two years).
The SMART schools program does not apply to renovations though the concepts and principles for frugal construction embodied in the regulations are applied by the district to all projects.
Among the criteria that the district considers are low energy use HVAC systems, low maintenance materials, etc.
Every school built by the district since the inception of the SMART schools program except for one has been rewarded with thrift funds.
The only school that did not qualify was Pizo Elementary that was located on a university campus and needed to include facilities related to the university.
The district has a written policy that encourages the design team to comply with the district's SMART school design philosophy and develop practical design solutions that are functional and cost effective.
Partnering during construction helps to reduce costs.
Recognizing that sometimes project costs go up due to miscommunications within the project team, the district encourages partnering sessions at the beginning of every major project and, occasionally, throughout the duration of the project.
Construction managers also hold team luncheons on site during construction.
All projects have single-point accountability.
With a view toward expediting problems that may arise anytime during the life of a project and particularly during construction, the district establishes a single point of contact and authority for every project in the form of its project coordinator.
Project coordinators may call upon other district resources as needed and do have support of inspection personnel as needed.
More serious problems are elevated to higher levels and senior management gets involved in these issues with a view toward speedy resolution and on-budget, on-time delivery.
Educational specifications are frequently updated.
Educational Specifications are updated frequently to minimize the number of built-in items, and to make the classrooms as generic and therefore as versatile as possible.
However this procedure does not rise to the level of established best practice relative to the creation of educational specifications (please see discussion and recommendations provided under best practices 3, 5, 11 and 12).
10-32
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction Some facilities are shared but no regional multi-use facility has been constructed.
The use of a regional facility in lieu of separate facilities for each school can increase opportunities for interaction between the school and community residents and provide a better quality of common facility than would be possible if it needed to be replicated at each and every school site.
The school district reported that it has explored using regional multi-use facilities, but has not found this alternative to be cost-effective.
Consequently, the school district has not built any regional multi-use sports/music/drama complexes to be shared by several middle and high schools.
However, there are ongoing efforts with Hillsborough County Parks Department to share ball fields, and cooperation in allowing them to construct their buildings on school board land for after school care.
Green Architecture principles are stressed.
The school district held a Green Architecture Seminar for Architects and Construction Managers to heighten awareness of Green Architecture principles.
Current designs are checked to ensure that principles are being upheld.
In the HVAC area for example, every new school design must consider at least three options.
19
The district minimizes construction costs through the use of prototype school designs and frugal construction practices.
SDHC uses prototypes wherever they are appropriate.
SDHC uses prototypes wherever they are appropriate.
Proof of the district's frugal construction practices is evidenced by the amount of money it has received in SIT awards.
For example, recently opened Alonzo High School will receive $5 million in SIT awards.
In fact, the district has qualified for about $20 million in SIT awards over the past five years.
There are at least three applications of the elementary school prototype and three applications of the middle school plan.
SDHC has calculated that based upon the difference in fees to design new schools as opposed to reusing prototype designs, a savings of between $2 to $3 million in architect fees can be attributed to using prototypes.
Altogether, there have been about 12 prototype reuses.
Often, due to programmatic issues, designs tailored to the district's needs are required.
This is advantageous because prototypes may not always be the most economical solution.
The economies of prototypes are evident when they can be reused with as little site-based customization as possible.
Changes in the architectural design result in corresponding changes to mechanical, electrical and plumbing design and after a point, the benefits of using the prototype design are lost.
The district has also found that the extent of deviation that will be required from a prototype design when specialized programs are being considered makes them not economically viable ­ again because of the extensive changes in design that will be required.
In other words, prototypes are offered as a complete pre-packaged solution and their value gets diluted as they get customized because of the increased cost and time for design.
A good example of where a prototype solution would have been inappropriate is the design of the performing arts school at Blake High School.
It is one of several very specialized programs in the district that is supported by the kind of high quality facilities needed to sustain the high quality of the educational program.
In interviews with the school principal and a comprehensive site assessment, Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. concluded that the design of Blake High School is a good model to follow in all cases where the school has very specialized needs.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-33
Facilities Construction
20
The district secures appropriate professional services to assist in facility planning, design, and construction but does not do so in every case.
The following discussion relates to the district's present use of the eight indicators associated with this best practice: a.
The district can demonstrate that procedures for selection were in compliance with ss. 287.055 and 235-211, Florida Statutes, and that the committee screened written applications in order to select an appropriate number of professionals to be interviewed and that selected candidates were interviewed.
b.
The district appoints a selection committee to find appropriate professionals for each construction project who are familiar with architecture, design and construction, and engineering.
c.
The district can demonstrate that interviewers considered experience and adequacy of technical personnel and availability of particular individuals for the project, proximity of the candidate's office to the district, thoroughness, creativity within the context of sound construction practices and wise expenditures of public funds, adequacy of supervision, business procedures and record keeping on the job, financial responsibility, suitability of size and type of organization and methods of operation, willingness of the candidate to make changes in plans at various points in the process, ability and inclination of the candidate to protect the district's interests in his or her dealings with the contractor, minority business enterprise, and that references were contacted.
d.
The district can demonstrate that finalists were evaluated based on interviews; visits to examples of their work; interviews with previous clients; examination of typical documents such as plans, specifications, and change orders; and visits to the architects' offices.
e.
The district can demonstrate that the contracts with professionals include all of the district's requirements, meet the requirements of current law, and clear the amounts and methods of compensation, and compensation does not encourage overbuilt or extravagant project costs.
f.
The selection committee reviews and evaluates the performance of professionals at the completion of the project and the findings are referred to the board and to the professionals for use when making future selections.
g.
The district needs to bring on professionals earlier in the process than they currently do.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. has found that many of the larger school projects done by SDHC would have benefited from having specialized consultants on board early to guide the project through the planning and design phases.
The quality of schools being built by SDHC can be improved by appointing professionals either as architects themselves or to supplement the architectural team. h.
In the area of applying frugal and life cycle cost analyses to site selection, educational specifications and facilities list, the district often has to balance competing goals.
For example, SIT awards are based on first cost which may serve as a disincentive to spending more up front to save from a lifecycle standpoint.
The following discussion earlier in this chapter from best practice number 10 is relevant here.
With capital construction intended to last a longtime, it is often shortsighted to make material selections and other design decisions such the selection of electrical, mechanical and plumbing systems based on initial cost.
Sometimes, it is better to select materials that may have a higher initial cost when such expenditures can be justified by lower life-cycle cost.
The current system of rewarding school districts with SIT funds purely on the basis of first costs serves as a disincentive to use the life-cycle costing approach.
In the case of SDHC, Gibson Consulting did not find any pervasive effort to cut costs by building inferior quality schools but the district admits that when financial pressures mount, there is the possibility that life cycle costing will give way to lower initial costs.
10-34
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction The district's consultant selection process is an effective hybrid of objectivity and subjectivity.
The district's process for using professional services to assist in planning, design, and construction is an effective hybrid of objectivity and subjectivity.
The state statute encourages objectivity.
However, the district spends time interviewing and hearing presentations from applicants.
There are approximately 50 local design firms that the district has worked with.
SDHC does allow outside firms to partner with local firms and tries to assign innovative thinkers to the new schools it builds.
Consideration of past performance is an important step of the selection process and is accomplished by oral testimony of District staff.
Selection Committee recommendations are presented to the board in the form of an Order of Priority for subsequent negotiations.
21
The district can demonstrate that funds collected for school projects were raised appropriately.
Systems are in place to apply funds collected only toward eligible project costs.
The following is a description of the system in place to ensure that revenue is spent only for eligible expenses.
Projects are always assigned to a source of funds by their scope of work (as opposed to receiving revenue and trying to find a way to spend it).
The accountant within the Operations Division is familiar with each fund's criteria for expenditures and ensures that projects are not assigned incorrectly.
Therefore, when a new project is requested, the accountant will first look for an appropriate source of funds.
In order to assign a project number to a new project, that new project number must be entered into the school district's "system master" file.
Entering a project into the "system master" file requires that specific funds be listed for which the project number will be valid.
This then puts an edit on the project's number so that in any financial transaction the use of an invalid (i.e. incorrect) fund will automatically be rejected as an error.
In 1995-96 the district had no limit to transfer capital outlays toward operating budgets.
Since then, the state has passed a law that allows 25 percent of the amount of capital outlays to be transferred for operations.
The district has consistently remained within this state limit.
In fact, capital transfers have declined steadily and are expected to fall to 10 percent.
This target will be difficult to meet because of the current economic downturn.
a.
The district can demonstrate that when local bond referendum proceeds are used, the scope of each project is spelled out in the bond resolution.
b.
The district can demonstrate that if local sales-surtax revenue is used to finance certain projects, the scope of each project was spelled out in sales-surtax referendum resolution advertisement.
c.
The district evaluates in writing the advantages and disadvantages of alternative methods for funding and financing construction projects when developing its capital-planning budget.
This is also spelled out in the above discussion of the district's process for ensuring that funds are only used toward eligible projects.
The five-year capital outlay plan includes a section 4 on which all funding sources enumerated and tied to the costs of the projects in section five.
Section 7 provides a comparison between revenue and estimated project expenses.
As a separate but supporting activity, SDHC also creates project-funding sheets for each fund source.
Each of these sheets summarizes each project within a funding source and includes a bottom line comparison between project costs and available revenues for that fund source.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-35
Facilities Construction
Timely Completion of Projects When it comes to completing projects on time, the district has an impressive record.
Seventeen of the last eighteen schools built over the last five years opened on time.
The only late project was delayed due to weather factors outside the district's control.
22
District planning provides realistic time frames for implementation that are coordinated with the opening of schools.
Most projects are completed on time.
Tasks for achieving all phases of each project are incorporated.
Project schedules are developed to insure project completion in advance of the date of intended occupancy.
"Realistic time frames" are achieved by soliciting input from each project's stakeholders during the development of the project schedule.
"On time" at SDHC is a simple concept, meaning that the construction activities are completed according to project schedules.
The district's policies and procedures are generally in compliance with generally accepted architectural planning and financial management practices.
Most of its projects are completed on time and within budget.
Master schedules for schools are prepared by working backwards from the intended school opening date.
Only one school ­ West Chase Elementary - opened late and this was due primarily to weather factors.
Seventeen out of the last 18 schools built by the district opened on time.
Further, the opening of schools coincides with the school calendar.
Schedules are published, included within the Construction Manager and Architect/Engineer agreements and updated regularly during construction.
Project schedules include all tasks that are needed to complete the project on time.
Status reports to the board are made periodically.
The Plan contains an accountability component and budget updates are provided periodically.
Status reports to the Board are made periodically.
The school board approves each design phase of the project.
The board considers alternative delivery methods.
The board has considered alternative delivery methods including design/build and turnkey (please see discussion about Job Order Contracting in Chapter 11).
Reports to the Board are made periodically.
The school board approves each design phase of the project.
The district regularly evaluates the performance and cost of the program and analyzes potential cost savings of alternatives, such as outside contracting and privatization.
In fact, a majority of the services provided by the Planning and Construction Department are already privatized.
Construction costs represent the most significant portion of monies spent by the district relative to facilities.
The district realizes that controlling construction costs is of primary importance.
Toward this goal, they have instituted several internal and external checks and balances to control construction costs.
Among the accountability mechanisms, the district employs the atrisk Construction Manager (at-risk CM) model that combines good management with the benefits of competitive bidding.
10-36
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction
23
For each project or group of projects, the architect and district facilities planner develop a conceptual site plan and building specifications.
Architects work with the district to develop and refine alternatives.
Each architect is required to develop three alternative solutions at the site planning level.
These are presented to a committee who make the final decision about which scheme will be selected.
Usually, the architect develops conceptual site plans even before the site is acquired to make sure it works.
For example, at Mary Bryant Elementary and Farnell Middle School the architect was brought in to do schematic layouts to ensure that the two schools would fit on the proposed site.
This is a good practice, because it ensures that the sites being acquired are suitable for the proposed schools.
It also ensures that the district does not expend substantial sums of money to make an unsuitable site that it has already acquired workable.
Knowing early if a site is suitable means that the district can focus its efforts elsewhere if there are significant problems with a site and thereby save both time and money.
Architects develop building specifications for each construction project with input and direction from Planning 
Each project has a set of specifications tailored for that project.
As district standards are updated, architects are alerted and the specifications updated as appropriate.
Tailored specifications take current bid climate into account when selecting materials and techniques.
During the course of developing the project, the architect and district work together to ensure that the cost of construction, energy conservation, life cycle costing (see previous discussion on this subject under best practice 20) and operating costs of the various designs are considered.
The district follows generally accepted and legal contracting practices to control costs.
24
The district follows generally accepted and legal contracting practices to control costs.
Privatization and innovative bidding systems are considered.
The contracting practices used by the district such as the at-risk CM system is a good way to control costs.
Since most of the work is already done by the private sector, there isn't much scope to privatize any more.
All contracting is done according to legal practices.
The district obtains sealed bids that are opened in the project coordinator's presence.
After confirming and evaluating the bids, they are presented to the board with Guaranteed Maximum Price (GMP) requests.
As a further check, project coordinators review requested bid awards within each discipline.
Further, the accounting department reviews all documents to be sure they are in order prior to and during construction.
All contracts are further reviewed by board attorneys and approved by the board.
The board uses generally accepted bidding procedures and the contractor submits required documents.
Bids are opened at the exact time advertised and inspected to conform that all required documents are in order.
The district submits all selected contracts to the board for approval and award.
Negotiated contracts comply with applicable law.
Or example, all consultants are selected in accordance with the state mandated Consultant Contracting Negotiations Act (CCNA).
Legal counsel at the district reviews Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-37
Facilities Construction all contracts and the district awards contracts to the lowest responsible bidder selected pursuant to s. 287.055, Florida Statutes.
Contractors are also required to submit a signed owner-contractor agreement, a workers' compensation insurance certificate, a payment bond and performance bond.
25
The district has assigned one person with the authority and responsibility to keep facilities construction projects within budget and on schedule.
Project coordinators serve as single point for project accountability.
Authority and accountability for construction project starts with the deputy superintendent for Instructional Support ­ one person everyone has to go out to ­ in terms of alterations to the master document which lists all project budgets.
One assigned project manager manages each project from inception through completion.
The district ensures that project managers have the requisite experience and qualifications for this position.
The project manager reports to the Director of planning and construction who is responsible for implementing the five-year facilities work plan and the project manager is held accountable for keeping facilities construction projects within budget and on time.
Staff includes five project coordinators responsible for on-time, on-budget project delivery.
The project manager is supported by a staff of support professionals in the various specialty areas like site acquisition, finance and construction inspection.
The actual design of projects is performed by outside consultants under the supervision of the project manager.
Principals monitor and review projects with the area director not in a technical role but to ensure that published schedules are being adhered to and that schools are prepared to coordinate their efforts in the administrative and organizational areas to ease any construction-related inconveniences.
Sometimes top people have to meet with the community.
26
The board minimizes changes to facilities plans after final working drawings are initiated in order to minimize project costs.
District's change order costs are below industry averages.
The district recognizes that changes made late in the project life cycle are expensive.
It has established a goal of limiting change orders on projects after construction to no more than five percent of the construction budget for new schools and 10 percent for school renovation projects.
These are reasonable industry standards.
However, over the past five years, the district's actual record for change orders on new schools stands at two percent and for renovations it stands at five percent.
The district has a system for deductive change orders when owner controlled insurance program is in effect or when the owner purchases materials.
The district will not approve change orders that will exceed the approved budget, compromise educational specifications or exceed industry standards.
Change orders are also reviewed by project managers prior to submission to ensure that they will not extend the completion date beyond the date projected, unless unforeseen circumstances occur.
10-38
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction
27
The architect recommends payment based on the percentage of work completed.
A percentage of the contract is withheld pending completion of the project.
Payments are based upon work completed, architects and project managers review and approve all payments, and retainages are applied to all construction contracts.
The architect recommends payment based on the percentage of work completed.
All payments to contractors must first be reviewed and approved by the architect.
The district withholds 10 percent retainage on all payments made to contractors.
Architects must sign off on payment requests before they are paid.
The retainage is usually released to the contractor upon declaration of the project being substantial completed.
Terms of retainage are spelled out in the general conditions of the construction contract and the contract for the CM. Monies are also retained after substantial completion to cover punch list.
A punch list represents smaller items of contractually required work that have not yet been completed to the owner's satisfaction.
The value held is usually equal to three times the value of outstanding work.
This gives the contractor a financial incentive to finish the work quickly.
Final payment is not released until the punch list is complete and the project is board accepted.
The district's project manager in charge of the project must concur with all payments made.
In order to ensure that contractors are only paid for work actually done, monthly pay application meetings are held on site and are attended by the project coordinator, architect, and construction manager.
28
The district requires appropriate inspection of all school construction projects.
District inspectors who are certified and licensed by the state monitor construction on a day-to-day basis.
Inspectors are certified and licensed by the state.
Inspectors on behalf of the state also monitor construction on a day-to-day basis.
The district has six full-time inspectors.
Each inspector spends 40 hours a week at various sites.
Projects under construction are visited at least once a week and often once a day.
Additionally, on larger projects, architects have full-time on-site monitoring responsibility.
The district can demonstrate that it provides and requires competent continuous inspection by a certified Uniform Building Code Inspector that the inspection complies with Ch. 235, Florida Statutes, and the State Requirements for Educational Facilities.
Projects are also monitored by the project architect and engineer and often by a designated "Clerk of the Works."
A certificate of substantial completion is issued and Certificate of Occupancy obtained before the building is occupied.
If a facility fails inspection, the contractor must first perform required corrective work before a certificate of occupancy will be issued.
District contract documents do not require a quality assurance or quality control plan to be submitted by contractors Currently, the district does not have a process that would require contractors to review and manage quality control.
For large construction projects, it is a good idea to require contractors to submit a Quality Assurance/Quality Control plan.
This will permit the district to monitor that the contractor is observing
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-39
Facilities Construction required measures as outlined in the plan to construct the building in accordance with industry standard protocols for quality and manufacturer's guidelines.
Recommendations ·
___________________________________________
We recommend that every contractor submit a brief Quality Assurance and Quality Control plan for major capital projects.
This will help the district monitor performance and demand adherence to quality compliance against a specific and contractually mandated document.
Action Plan 10-5 provides the steps needed to implement this recommendation.
Action Plan 10-5 Quality Assurance and Quality Control Strategy Action Needed Institutionalize a program of Quality Assurance and Quality Control for major capital projects.
Step 1: Review professional literature on these topics.
Step 2: Evaluate programs presently in use by other districts.
Step 3: Consider revising standard agreements to require specific performance by the architects, contractors and construction managers.
Assistant Superintendent for Operations October 2003 The recommendation can be completed with existing resources.
Who Is Responsible Time Frame Fiscal Impact
Source: Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. and the School District of Hillsborough County.
Construction Program
29
The district conducts a comprehensive orientation to the new facility prior to its use so that users better understand the building design and function.
Comprehensive building orientation for new users is routinely done.
Orientation to new facilities is provided at the earliest possible date.
The scheduling of such training is dependent on the availability of the occupants.
As shown in Exhibit 10-11, .our review of 21 recently completed school construction projects found that the district completed the new facility orientation for each project in the month proceeding the school class start date.
In new schools, the staff reports to work approximately two weeks prior to opening day.
It is during this interval that training is scheduled.
Training sessions are often recorded on video for the staff's future use.
The district provides customized orientation programs for maintenance personnel and school staff.
The district has a comprehensive new facility orientation program which provide users with a good understanding of the building design and
10-40
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction function.
Responsibility for the orientation program is shared by the department of planning and construction, the architect and the contractor.
Exhibit 10-11
The District Routinely Conducts New School Orientations Prior to the Beginning of Classes School High Schools Alonso Middleton Freedom South County Career Center D.W. Waters Career Center Middle Schools Randall Davidsen Martinez Farnell Liberty Memorial Elementary Schools Westchase Pride Bevis Symmes McKitrick Chiles Bryant Cimino Ippolito Oak Grove Source: The School District of Hillsborough County
Certificate of Occupancy 6/01 7/02 8/02 7/02 5/02 5/00 7/00 3/02 7/02 7/02 8/00 12/98 8/00 8/00 8/01 8/01 8/01 7/02 7/02 7/02 8/01
Classes Actually Began 8/01 8/02 8/02 8/02 8/02 8/00 8/00 8/02 8/02 8/02 8/00 1/99 8/00 8/00 8/01 8/01 8/01 8/02 8/02 8/02 8/01
Orientation 6/01 7/02 7/02 7/02 7/02 7/00 7/00 7/02 7/02 7/02 8/00 12/98 8/00 8/00 8/01 8/01 8/01 8/02 8/02 8/02 8/01
Contractors and sub-contractors brief school personnel regarding occupancy issues.
Often videos of training sessions are prepared in following areas: · · · · · HVAC Food Service Elevators Fire Alarm Intercom
Training is always targeted.
For example fire alarm and intercom training is given to maintenance department staff and food service equipment training is given to food service personnel.
The school principal gets a general orientation and key staff gets a walk thru of each building before occupancy.
Training and orientation meetings are scheduled at the time of substantial projection completion.
Orientation/training is specified on all projects.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-41
Facilities Construction The district does not conduct comprehensive building evaluations at the end of the first year of operation and regularly during the next three to five years to collect information about building operation and performance.
Some post occupancy evaluations are done but not for every project.
Post occupancy evaluations are done and utilized but not on all buildings The district does not routinely conduct comprehensive evaluations that examine building operations and performance at the end of the first year of occupancy for each new facility.
However, the district does conduct inspections on some of the new school construction projects to determine if any work under warranty requires service.
The district also does not routinely perform additional evaluations at appropriate intervals during the first three to five years of operation as called for by this best practice.
This prevents the district from having a complete store of relevant and useful data that could inform the design of new buildings.
Currently, the district does not have sufficient objective data about the quality of its construction program from both a technical perspective and from the perspective of the user community.
The district agrees that all projects need POEs and has indicated that it has plans to develop and implement the necessary controls to ensure that post occupancy evaluations will be completed as required.
The district is planning to use the Internet so the facility user community can complete query forms.
This system could be used to poll hundreds of teachers.
In the past, POEs were manually conducted.
The district hopes to move into an automated procedure Some areas like energy, water use and safety are monitored on a regular basis.
There is not a comprehensive evaluation performed but district hopes to do its POEs online soon.
While annual safety inspections are routinely scheduled, other systems are looked at more randomly ­ but always if there are problems.
Some standards are modified as a result of field inspections, but formal process to conduct thorough POEs will improve this function.
30
The district does not routinely analyze building evaluations to determine whether facilities are fully used, operating costs are minimized, and changes in the district's construction planning process are needed.
The district does conduct some post occupancy evaluations whose information is fed back to the planning and construction department for incorporation in future projects.
Individual departments such as safety, HVAC and low-voltage systems also conduct their own independent assessments of buildings on a periodic basis.
However, these efforts do not rise to the level of a formal, structured process that is applied across the board.
Neither is it so complete that meaningful feedback into the educational specifications process is possible.
While some feedback does get back to the architect and construction manager to be used in the next planning cycle, the process is not sufficiently rigorous to ensure that allimportant data is routinely fed back into the design process.
As mentioned in best practice number 30 above, some changes to facilities to be built in the future come about as a result of post occupancy evaluations, but a more thorough and comprehensive system is needed.
10-42
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction
Recommendations ·
___________________________________________
We recommend that Post Occupancy Evaluations should be routinely done on all major capital projects.
Formal systems to submit POE data to the planning, construction and maintenance departments should be designed.
Only by having a successful POE system in place will the district have the information it needs about the effectiveness of its existing processes for planning and designing schools.
It will also obtain valuable feedback from its maintenance personnel that can be incorporated into improved design standards.
Action Plan 10-6 provides the steps needed to implement this recommendation.
Action Plan 10-6 Post Occupancy Evaluations Strategy Action Needed Implement routine post occupancy evaluations on all major capital projects.
Step 1: Review professional literature on this topic.
Step 2: Evaluate current practices of other districts.
Step 3: Identify goals and objectives of the survey.
Step 4: Develop topics and queries to be included.
Step 5: Select mechanism of delivery Step 6: Develop statistical methods for assessing data.
Assistant Superintendent of Operations October 2003 To be determined
Who Is Responsible Time Frame Fiscal Impact
Source: Gibson Consulting Group, Inc. and the School District of Hillsborough County.
31
The district analyzes maintenance and operations costs to identify improvements to the district's construction planning process but feedback loops from maintenance to construction need to be strengthened.
Major systems design is influenced by feedback from maintenance and operations but this process needs to be strengthened As noted in the discussion and recommendation for best practice number 30 above, the district collects, maintains and analyzes records of costs of maintenance and operations for each facility but this information does not always flow back effectively to the planning and construction program so that they can be an effective aid to future capital planning.
Energy, water and safety are regularly evaluated.
The district has a computerized maintenance system that allows them to monitor usage trends.
For instance, concerns regarding the fire alarm at Blake High School were voiced.
The project coordinator, the construction manager, and the electrical sub-contractor met to address the concerns.
The problems were analyzed and corrected.
In the coordination between Construction and Maintenance, some component areas work better than others.
For example, mechanical people give better feedback than those working on other systems.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-43
Facilities Construction Unlike some of the architectural areas such as with building materials and roofing, there is a built-in process for feedback in the mechanical area where every new school must be designed with three alternate mechanical systems that the representatives from maintenance get to review and select from.
During this process, they are able to reject or modify systems that have been problematic in the past.
Maintenance changes are also captured in the building standards that are used by the engineers designing new schools.
The district can identify improvements made to its construction planning process based on its analysis of maintenance and operations costs.
For example, air-conditioning systems are constantly evaluated and recommendations made to the Planning and Construction Department.
Communications and Electronics personnel provide information to the Planning and Construction department regarding preferred intercom and fire alarm specifications.
The recommendation associated with best practice number 30 above will address the problems raised in the above discussion.
32
The district analyzes maintenance and operations costs to identify improvements to the district's construction planning process but feedback loops from maintenance to construction need to be strengthened.
Major systems design is influenced by feedback from maintenance and operations but this process needs to be strengthened The district collects, maintains and analyzes records of costs of maintenance and operations for each facility but this information does not always flow back effectively to the planning and construction program so that they can be an effective aid to future capital planning.
Energy, water and safety are regularly evaluated.
The district has a computerized maintenance system that allows them to monitor usage trends.
For instance, concerns regarding the fire alarm at Blake High School were voiced.
The project coordinator, the construction manager, and the electrical sub-contractor met to address the concerns.
The problems were analyzed and corrected.
In the coordination between Construction and Maintenance, some component areas work better than others.
For example, mechanical people give better feedback than those working on other systems.
Unlike some of the architectural areas such as with building materials and roofing, there is a built-in process for feedback in the mechanical area where every new school must be designed with three alternate mechanical systems that the representatives from maintenance get to review and select from.
During this process, they are able to reject or modify systems that have been problematic in the past.
Maintenance changes are also captured in the building standards that are used by the engineers designing new schools.
The district can identify improvements made to its construction planning process based on its analysis of maintenance and operations costs.
For example, air-conditioning systems are constantly evaluated and recommendations made to the Planning and Construction Department.
Communications and Electronics personnel provide information to the Planning and Construction department regarding preferred intercom and fire alarm specifications.
10-44
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Facilities Construction
Recommendations ·
___________________________________________
Recommendation and action plan set forth for best practice number 30 above apply to this best practice.
Gibson Consulting Group, Inc.
Page 10-45
